District of Columbia statutes.
8-636.03

Timing of review.

A court shall not review a challenge to a response action chosen by the Mayor or to review any order issued by the Mayor, pursuant to § 8-634.01, except in the following circumstances:

(1)

An action pursuant to § 8-634.01(a)(4);

(2)

An action for reimbursement pursuant to § 8-634.02;

(3)

An action pursuant to § 8-634.07(1), (2), (4), and (5);

(4)

An action for contribution pursuant to § 8-634.09; and

(5)

An action pursuant to § 8-636.02(b).

June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 603
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-369, § 2(m), 58 DCR 996